Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,110
Retailer;
return; filing requirements.

Each retailer shall
file a tax return with the department on forms prescribed by the department.
Annual returns are required if the retailer's yearly tax liability is less
than two hundred fifty dollars. Quarterly returns are required if the retailer's
yearly tax liability is at least two hundred fifty dollars but less than six
thousand dollars. Monthly returns are required if the retailer's yearly tax
liability is at least six thousand dollars. The return shall contain a declaration
by the person making the return to the effect that the statements contained
in the return are true and are made under penalties of law, which declaration
has the same force and effect as a verification of the return and is in lieu
of such verification. The return shall show such information as the department
reasonably requires for the proper administration and enforcement of the Compressed
Fuel Tax Act. The retailer shall file the return in such format as prescribed
by the department on or before the twentieth day of the next
succeeding calendar month following the reporting period to which it relates.
If the final filing date falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the
next secular or business day is the final filing date. The return is filed
on time if transmitted or postmarked before midnight of the final filing date.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 14;

Laws 2000, LB 1067, § 24;

Laws 2001, LB 168, § 11;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 43;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 20.